Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.713

Legal liaison—Child abuse and neglect court cases.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, at least one legal liaison position shall be established within the department in each of its regions to work with both the department and the office of the attorney general for the purpose of assisting with the preparation of child abuse and neglect court cases.

(2)(a) To the extent possible, the workload of the legal liaisons shall be geographically divided to reflect where the highest risk and most vulnerable child abuse and neglect cases are filed.

(b) For the purpose of this subsection, "highest risk" and "most vulnerable" are determined by the age of the child and whether the child is particularly vulnerable given the child's medical or developmental conditions.

(3) The department may determine the necessary qualifications for the legal liaison positions established in this section.

[ 2024 c 328 s 107.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 328: See note following RCW 13.34.050.